Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.815

Financial aid advising day.

(1)(a) Beginning with the 2020-21 school year, within existing resources, and in collaboration with the Washington student achievement council, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate a financial aid advising day with all school districts with a high school.

(b) For the purposes of this section and RCW 28A.230.310, a "financial aid advising day" means a day or series of days between September 1st and December 1st of each year that includes, but is not limited to, dedicated time during regular school hours for staff to:

(i) Provide information to twelfth grade students on the free application for federal student aid, the Washington application for state financial aid, and the college board's CSS profile;

(ii) As appropriate and whenever possible, assist twelfth grade students in completing the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid; and

(iii) In conjunction with the Washington student achievement council, distribute information on the Washington college grant and demonstrate the use of the college financial aid calculator created in RCW 28B.77.280.

(c) Each school district may choose the date or series of dates on which to hold a financial aid advising day.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall coordinate with the Washington student achievement council whenever possible to assist districts in facilitating opportunities outside of regular school hours for parents to take part in seminars on completing the free application for federal student aid and the Washington application for state financial aid. Whenever possible, districts shall provide spoken language interpreter services for limited English-speaking families.

(3) Schools must allow students over the age of eighteen to opt out and parents or guardians of students under the age of eighteen to opt their student out of scheduled financial aid advising day activities.

(4) A student may not be penalized for failing to complete financial aid applications or for opting out of activities under subsection (3) of this section.

(5) Educational staff, including instructional, administrative, and counseling staff, may not be assessed or penalized on the basis of students' completion of financial aid forms or students' decisions to opt out under subsection (3) of this section.

(6) In the administration of the financial aid advising day, personally identifiable student or family information must be protected in accordance with state and federal privacy laws.

[ 2020 c 307 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2020 c 307: See notes following RCW 28B.77.290.